Arkansas, session 2025, HB1883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 13 — Arkansas Fourth Amendment Protection Act

25-1-1301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Fourth
Amendment Protection Act".

25-1-1302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Electronic data" means information related to an electronic
communication or the use of an electronic communication service, including
without limitation:
*ANS431*
03/20/2025 8:13:32 AM ANS431

HB1883
(A) The content, sender, recipient, or format of an
electronic communication;
(B) The precise or approximate location of the sender or
recipient of an electronic communication at any time during the
communication;
(C) The time or date the electronic communication was
created, sent, or received; and
(D) The identity of an individual or device involved in
the electronic communication, including without limitation an internet
protocol address;
(2) "Metadata" means information generally not visible when an
electronic document is printed describing the history, tracking data, or
management of the electronic document, including without limitation:
(A) Information about data in the electronic document that
describes how, when, and by whom the data were collected, created, accessed,
or modified; and
(B) How the data are formatted; and
(3) "State agency" means an instrumentality of state government,
including without limitation a board, commission, committee, advisory board,
office, department, institution, bureau, council, administrative program,
agency, and division.

25-1-1303. State entities prohibited from assisting federal agencies
collecting electronic data or metadata.
The state or a state agency shall not assist, participate with, or
provide material support or resources to enable a United States Government
agency in the collection or use of a person's electronic data or metadata,
unless one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The person has given informed consent; or
(2) The collection or use of the electronic data or metadata is:
(A) Pursuant to a warrant that:
(i) Is based upon reasonable cause; and
(ii) Describes with particularity the person, place,
or thing to be searched or seized; or
(B) According to a legally recognized exception to the
warrant requirement.
03/20/2025 8:13:32 AM ANS431